ga_IE/hyph_ga_IE.dic
ISO8859-1
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
1'.
NEXTLEVEL
.ab4ai
.ab1a
.ab6ar
.a1b5r
.ac6ad
.ac1a
.ach6ar5
.ach1a
.ac2h
.ad6aim
.ad1ai
.ad6am
.ae5n1
.ag6ar
.ag1a
.agh4a
.ag2h1
.ag4ó
.ag5r
.ag6úi
.ag3ú
.ai6c5
.ail6t2e
.ail1t2
.ai2n3g4
.ain6te.
.ain1t
.ain6t5ín1
.aint1í
.air6ní
.air1
.ais3
.aist4
.ais6te.
.aí4
.ala5m6
.al1a
.al5g6
.alla3g6
.a6l2l1
.alm4ó
.al1m
.al2t5a
.a6l1t
.al6t5á
.am6ac
.am6á
.an2a
.ana5c4
.anac2h6
.an2á
.an1c6
.an6dór1
.an1d2
.an6dr
.an6fa
.an1f
.ang4l
.a2ng1
.an6i
.an6lain4
.an1l
.an6lan
.an6ó
.an6rai
.an1r
.an3ra
.an6s1a
.an1s2
.an2ta
.an1t
.ar2
.aral4
.ar1a
.ara6l1t3
.ara5m6
.ara5s6
.ard5
.ar1ó5
.a4róc6
.art4
.as6ail
.as1a
.as6aim5
.as6al.
.as6am
.asa5m6a
.asc6ar5
.asc1
.as6ó
.as6pa.
.as1p
.as2t
.ast5ai6
.as1ta
.ast5aí
.a4st3ó
.as6tú
.as4ú
.at1a6
.at5ar.
.at2ar
.at6á
.áil6te.
.áil1t
.áilt2e
.áil6t5ea
.áir5ge
.4áir4g3
.áir1
.áir5g1í
.áir6s2
.ál6t
.ál1
.ár2a
.ár1
.ár6m
.ba6d
.bad3á
.bal6b
.beo5f
.beo5g
.beo5id
.beo5im
.bh4
.bhá5ite.
.bhá5it1í
.bheo5f
.b4he
.bheo5id
.bheo5im
.bheo5in
.bhí5d2ís
.bhí5mis
.4bh3ím
.bhí5oda
.4bhío
.bhí5omar
.bhí5teá6
.4bhít
.bhít4e
.bhí5t1í
.bh1lí3
.bhreo5f
.bhreo5id
.bhreo5im
.bhreo5in
.bhrí3o
.b1lí3
.breo5f
.breo5id
.breo5im
.brí3o
.b1rí
.ca4
.cac2h5
.c1ac
.ca4cht6
.ca3d5á
.c1ad
.caí5d
.c1aí
.caí5g1í
.caí5m
.caí5o
.car6t5ar
.c6art1a
.c2h4
.cha4
.c2hac2h5
.cha4c
.chad5á
.ch1ad
.chaí5d
.ch1aí
.chaí5g1í
.chaí5m
.chaí5o
.chaí5teá6
.chaít4e
.chaí5t1í
.chan5á
.char6t5ar
.chart1a
.char6t1á
.chár5ta.
.chá6
.5ch4ár1
.chár4t1a
.cheil6te.
.ch4eil
.cheil1t
.cheilt2e
.chí6
.chló5f
.chló5id
.chló5im
.chló5in2n1
.chnaí3
.chn2
.ch1n1a6
.ch1nó5
.chóis5
.ci6
.cil6
.cí6
.cli6
.clip5
.cló5f
.cló5id
.cló5im
.cnaí3
.2cn2
.cn1a6
.cnó5
.da6
.d2h2
.dhlí5d
.dh1lí
.dhlí5g
.dhlí5m
.dhlí3o
.dhó5ite.
.dhó5it1í
.dhreac2h5
.dhrea4cht6
.dhreo5f
.dhreo5id
.dhreo5im
.dhreo5in
.dlí5d
.dlí5g
.dlí5m
.dlí5o
.d1ó5f
.dó5idí
.dó5im
.dó5ite.
.dó5it1í
.dreac2h5
.dreo5f
.dreo5id
.dreo5im
.ead1
.ea6g3
.ea6l4t3
.earb5
.ea4s3tó
.ei6
.eis2c3e
.ei4s
.ei6sc
.eis4il
.eis1i
.éa6b
.éad6ar1
.éa2d1
.éa3g6ó
.éar5
.éart6
.éi5d6r
.éid1
.éi5gear
.éi2g1e
.éim5í
.fa6
.fac2h3
.feo5f
.feo5idí
.feo5im
.fhrioc2h5
.1fh2
.fh4rio
.fhua6f5air1
.f6hu
.fhua1f2
.fhua6far1a
.fhua5im.
.fí5dí
.fí5g
.fí5m
.fí5od2h
.fí4o
.fí5on2n1
.geal6t5aí
.2ge
.gea6l1t
.geat5
.g2h2
.ghair5t
.ghair1
.ghlae3
.ghla6
.ghrá6n1
.g1ó6f5
.ha4
.hab6ai
.hab1a
.hab6ar
.hac6ad
.ha4c
.hac1a
.hag6ar
.hag1a
.hag4ó
.hail6t2e
.hail1t2
.hai2n3g1
.hain3t
.hain6te.
.hair6ní
.hair1
.hais5ce
.hai6sc
.hais5tea
.hai4s5t6eo
.haist6i
.hais5t1ig
.h1aí4
.hala5m6
.hal5a
.halm4ó
.hal1m
.hal4t3a
.ha6l1t
.hal6t5á
.han2a
.hana5c4
.han1c6
.han6fa
.han1f
.hang4l
.ha2ng1
.han6ó
.han4ta
.han1t
.har2a
.har6á
.har6ó5
.ha4róc6
.hart6
.has6ai
.has1a
.has6al.
.has6am
.has4ta
.hat6á
.há6
.háil6te.
.háil1t
.háilt2e
.háil6t5ea
.háir5ge
.h4áir4g3
.háir1
.háir5g1í
.háir6s2
.hál6t
.hál1
.hár4a
.h4ár1
.hár6m
.head3
.hea6l4t3
.heis6il
.hei4s
.heis1i
.héad6ar1
.héa2d1
.héa3g6ó
.héid4e
.héid1
.héi5dea
.hib6é
.hi6b
.him6ire
.hi4m
.himir1
.h4ios5
.hiosc6
.hir4
.his4
.hist3
.hit6eo
.hit6r
.hí2
.híl3
.híoc2h5
.hí1oc
.hío4cht6
.h2oc4r
.hod6
.hog2h6
.h4og
.hoir6n5i
.hoir1
.hol6ac
.hol1a
.h4om2
.hor5m
.hort4
.hó6
.hua4f2
.huaf5a
.huil4e
.húd4
.ia5it
.iat6
.ib6é
.ibh5
.id2
.il3
.im6ire
.imir1
.in6d5ia
.in1d2
.in6id
.in3i
.in6ín1
.in1í
.in4ío
.in6ír1
.in6ste.
.in1s2
.inst4
.int6e
.in1t
.iomáin5
.6iom1á
.4ios3
.iosc6
.iost4
.ir4
.is4
.ist6
.it6
.íl3
.ío6
.íoc2h5
.í1oc
.ío4cht6
.íos5
.la4
.la4ch6t5
.lac2h
.lad5a
.la1g5á
.lait5
.lan5c
.lao5n
.lá5it1í
.leab3ó
.lea6m
.leas5
.leat6aí
.leat1a
.leo3c
.leoc2h4
.lé5a2nn.
.l4éan2n5
.lé5ig1í
.li6
.lib5é
.lim5
.lin1t6
.lip5
.lí5d
.lí5g
.lí5mi
.lí5od
.lí5omar
.lí5on2n1
.lí6t
.lí3t5i
.lú2
.mad5a
.m1ad
.mair5tí.
.m1ai
.mair1
.mair2t1í
.maí5d
.m1aí
.maí5g1í
.maí5mi
.maí5od
.maí5oma
.maí5on
.maí5teá6
.maít4e
.maí5t1í
.m1am5
.man2t3
.ma6r
.mar6l5
.mar6s5ac
.m3ar1s2
.mars1a
.mar6s5ai
.mar5t1a
.m3art
.m3a3r5ú
.ma6t
.mat3á
.mead5a
.m1e
.meat5á
.mh2
.mhad5a
.mhais6te.
.mhais3
.mhaist4
.mhais6tí.
.mhaist1í
.mhaí5d
.mh1aí
.mhaí5g1í
.mhaí5mi
.mhaí5od
.mhaí5oma
.mhaí5on
.mhaí5te.
.mhaít4e
.mhaí5teá6
.mhaí5t1í
.mhan4t3
.mhar6l5
.mhar6sa.
.mhar1s2
.mhars1a
.mhion6t5a
.mhion1t
.mhí6oc
.mhú6
.mhúc2h5
.mí6oc
.m1í
.mí5st
.nair5
.n1a
.nais5
.naí3
.naío5l6
.nar5
.n1d6
.nd1ó5f
.ndó5idí
.ndó5im
.ndó5in
.neac2h6
.nea4cht5
.neá6
.neád5
.2ng4
.ng1ó6f5
.nit6
.n1i
.ní5d
.ní5g1í
.ní5m
.ní6oc
.ní5od
.ní5om
.ní5on
.3nom6
.o4ch6t5
.oc2h
.2oc4r
.od6
.og2h6
.oil1t6
.oir4n3e
.oir1
.oir6n5i
.oir6n3í
.oir5t
.ol6ac
.ol1a
.om6a
.or6ai
.or5a
.ort4
.or6thu
.or1t2h2
.os6ló.
.os1l
.ost5a
.2óp6
.ór4á
.ór1
.phor5t6r
.1p2h
.pist6
.ra4
.rad5a
.ra1d5ó
.raf6t5
.raf3
.rai6
.ra3t5á
.rá6
.reas5
.reo5f
.reo5id
.reo5im
.reo5in
.réim5i
.rí5dí
.rí5g1í
.rí5mi
.rí6och1a
.rí1oc
.ríoc2h
.rí5od
.rí5oma
.rí5on2n1
.rób5a
.rób4
.4ró5c
.róc2h6
.róst5
.rua5im.
.ruai6
.rúm5
.sa6l
.s1a
.sal5a
.sá5it1í
.s1á
.sc6
.sca6
.sca3d5á
.sc1ad
.scar5
.scart6
.searbh5
.séa5l6ain4
.séal1
.séal1a
.shá5i2nn.
.1sh2
.sháin2n1
.si4
.s1im3
.siún4
.s1iú
.siún3t3
.sí4o
.sl4ios5
.s1l
.s1m4
.sní5d
.s1n2
.sní5g
.sní5m
.sní5od
.sní5oma
.sní5on
.s1ó5f
.só5idí
.só5im
.só5in2n1
.sóin4
.spléac2h5
.s1p
.sp6lé
.st4
.steam5
.ta6
.ta4ch6t5
.tac2h
.ta2n5g1
.tap5
.tar5t4a
.t2ar
.téit5e
.t4éit
.t2h2
.théit5ea
.t6hé
.thrá5it1í
.thró6f5
.ti6
.tró6f5
.tsí6o
.ts2
.t1sí
.tua5im
.ua4f2
.uaf5a
.ua6i
.uas6al1a
.uas1a
.uil2e
.uir6t
.uir1
.uirthi5
.uir1t2h2
.un6s5
.ur5b
.6ur3n4
.úd2
.úm5
.úr6ái
.úr1
ab1a
abac6
aba5c1a
aba5dá
ab4airt
abair1
a3b4al
ab4art
ab1á
ab3d
abh1
abh6ail1e
ab4ha
a3b4h6e
abh6ór1
abh1ó
abh6re
abh2t1
a5bi
ab1l
a5bó.
ab3óig
a5bón1
a1br
ab3rad6
abra3da
a5bu
ab1ú
ac1a
ac4ad1ú
ac1ad
acae6
ac4aoi
ac6ard3
aca1s4
ac4a4s5tó
acast6
aca3t4ú
a3c2áid1
ac1á
acá6i
acár5
ac5é
ach1a
ac2h
a4cha.
acha6d5á
ach1ad
achar5
ach4ar1f
acharn6
achart6
ach1á6
6a5ch4ár1
6a3che
ach3í
4ach1l
a6chl6i6
ach3óg1
ach5ór1
ach1r
6achri6
ac6h1ú
ac1l
3ac1m2
a2c1n2
ac1ó
ac1ra
acra3f3
ac4ras
ac3ré
a5cró
ac5ua
ac5ú
ad3a3g6
ad1al
ad1am
4adamh1
ada5n6ó
ad1an
ad3ar1a
adar1
ad3ar1l
ad5ar5t4
ad5áil
ad5ás
4ad1c
ad2h1
adh2b1
a3dhi
4a3dh4ro
a5dhú
ad3i
4ad3l
4a3d4o
a1dó
a4d3ód1
a2d1óf
a2d3óid
a4d3óig
a2d3óim
a4d3óin2n1
ad1r
a4d3rog
a3d2ro
ad3u
ad1ú
a3d4úr1
ae3a
ae1á
a4eil3
aeilg4
aeilí5t4e
aeilít6
aeil1í
af1
afa3dá
af5air1
af5art
afáil3
afáil2t6
afhol6
a1fh2
afh6ol1t5
a3f6l
a3fo
a3f4óib
a3f4óin
a1f2ón1
af6rá
af6ú
agad3á
ag1a
agair5n6
agair1
ag2al
a6g5áis
ag1á
a2g3e
ag3é
ag2h1
agh4aid
agh5an
a5ghi
ag3i
ag1l
a3go
a3graim
a3gra6m
a6g5re
a4g3ri
ag5rui
a3gru
ag3rú
ag3ua
ag3ú
a1h
ah6a
ai4ch6t1
aic1
aic2h1
ai5ciú
aic5r
6aidear
aid1e
4aidh1l
aid2h
aid1i
aid1ít5
ai3fil
aif1
ai3gin
6aig1is
ail5bh1í
ailc3ea
a4ilc
ail2ce
ailp3i
ailp3ín1
ail1t2
a6imh1
4ai3m3ia
aim3is1e
ain5í
ains5eo
ain1s2
ain6t3ean
ain1t
ain5té
air6bh3r
air1
airb4í
air4b5r
air4d3é
air4f5ean
air1f
airfea6
air6f5in.
airf3í
air4fín1
4airi6sc
airis6t4
air5nín1
air5nío
air4t5éis
6ai3sei
ais1e
aisi3n4é
ais1i
ai5s6íl3
ais1í
4ais1p
ais5teog
ai4st1eo
ais6ti5s3
ais5t6ín.
aist1í
aistín1
4ai1tei
ai5t6il
ait1i
aits3e
a4its2
4aivi
aiv1
aí2c
4aíní
aín1
aí3o3dó
aío5l6an
aíol1a
aí3onn1a
aíon2n1
aí5ói
al1a
ala3b
alabh4
al4ainne
alain4
alain2n1
alait4
al3aí
alan4a
alan5d3
al2an2n5
alas3
alasc6
4al4at2h1
al1á
a3l4áib
6alám
a3lár5
al1có
6al5e
al4f3air1
al1f
al3gó
al3i
a3lí
a6l2l1
al5o
al1ó
2al1r
a6l1t
alt3e
al6t5ód1
al4t1óf
al6t5óid
al6t5óim
al6t5óin
al6tú
al3ui
al3ú
alú3c2h4
am3a3b
ama3d4ú
am1ad
am1al
am5a6l2l1
am1an
am3ar1a
ama3raí
a6m1as
ama5s1ó
4a6mál1
am1á
am4án1a
amán1
4am1b2
amh1
amh5ad
amhais6t4
amhais3
a3mhas
a1mo
am5ón1a
am1ó
am2ón1
6amp
amp1a
amp1á
am4pr
4am1t
am5ut
am3úi
am5úr1
anac4
an1a
ana3c1a
a2n6ag
6anai2g1e
anaist4
an3ait
an5aí
ana5l6ó
anal3
ana5m6ó
ana5r6a
anat6
an1á
an5áis
aná6i
a5n6áis1e
an5ár1
6an1b
an2c1a
an1c
anc4aire
ancair1
an5c3é5
an2d3á
an1d2
andí6
andíb5
and3o
an3dr
6andu
an3e
an6ea
an3é
a2ng1
ang3a
anga3rú
ang3á
an5gó.
an5in5
an1i
an4ma
an1m
an2n5
6anná
an3oi
an5oí1
an1ó
anód4
an4ó3dó
an4san
an1s2
ans1a
an6sin
an6tu
an1t
an3u
anuas6
an1ú
aoc2h3
ao4cht6
6aod
ao5dar1
ao5id2ís
ao5im.
ao3imi
aoin6s2
aoin3t2
ao4l1
ao5mar
aon3u
ao6r1
aorg4
aort4
aos3t
ap1
apa5dá
a3p4ait
aplais6
apla4
ar1a
ara3b1ú
ar6ac.
ara3c6á
ara4ch6t5
arac2h
ara5c1ó
ara3g4a
araic6í
araic1
ara5l4á
a4ra3p4
ar5as.
ara5s1ó
ara3tó
ar1á
arb4h3a
ar3b4he
ar1c2h6
arc1ó
ar1cr
ar1e
ar2f1ó
ar1f
ar3i
arm4ó
a5ro
ar1ó
ar6óc6ar
a4róc
aróc1a
ar5ón1
ar5óp1
ar1p
ar4p3ó
ar4s3ál1
ar1s2
ars1á
ar6sta
ar3u
ar3úil
ar5úl1
ar3úp1
ar5ú5s6
a5rút
asa5c6a
as1a
a3s4ae
asain4
as5aí
as6alait4
asal1a
asa6l2t3
asa5mait
asam1ai
as6ar3b
asc1
ascar5
as5c6ar1a
ascart6
as3c2o
4ascr
4as3e
as3é
as3i
as3í
2as1l
as1o
as1ó
as6óil
a3s4ól1
as1ta
as6t5ais
astai6
ast4aí.
ast1aí
as1t3al
asta5r6ó
ast2ar
as6t3as
as3tán.
astán1
as5té
as3ti
as5to
a4stó
as5tór1
as5tua
ast6u
as3tú
as1u
as1ú
as6úd6
as4ú3it
asú5m
at1a
atac6
ata5c1á
atad5án1
at4agr
a5t6ain4t3
at5a1l2
ata3m
atam4á
a3t4an4t3
ata3p4
at5arn
at2ar
at3as
atá6i
a5tár1
at6á5t
atát2h6
até3
atéa2d6
at2h1
athrí5d
athrí5g1í
athrí5m
athrí5o
ath6us
at5ód1
a6tóg1
at3óid
at3óig
at3óim
at5rap1
at1rá
a6tro
at5s5a
ats2
at6sar
at1u
at4ui
at1ú
a5vó
áb3a
áb4al
áb1á
ábh1
ábht6
áb1l
á5bo
áb3ó
áb3ú
ác1a
ácar5
ácarn6
ách5á6
ác2h
ách5e
ách5i
ách3l
ách5r
á4ch4t3
ác3l
ác3r
ác3ú
ád1
á3d4ar1
ádh3a
ád2h
ádh5ú
á1fa
á4fa.
á6f3ac
áf5air1
áf5ar1a
á3fá
áf3l
áf1r
ága5dá
ág1a
á3gó
ág3r
ág5u
á5há
áib5é
áid1
á3id2ís
á3ig1í
áil5b
á4il3c6
áilt6eá6
áil1t
áilt2e
áilt3i
ái6m
á3im.
áim5é
á6imh1
á1imi
á6im5is1e
6áinia
áin3i
áin1s4
áin3te
áin1t
áin4t1eo
6áip1
4áir4g3
áir1
áirt3
ái6sc1
áist3e
áist3i
áis5t6íní
áist1í
áistín1
á3it2ear
áit1ea
áit3é
á4it3s2
á5íre
á2ír1
ál1
álc6
ál4s3
ám3an
á3mar
ám3at
ámh1
án1
án6g1a
á2ng
á3nn1a
án2n1
án1t4
áp1
ár1
árac2h3
ár5aim
ár5am
ár6c1a
á5r6é
4árn2
á3r4ol
ár4t1a
árt6ai
árt6an
árt6r
ás3a
ásc3
ás5c6á
ás5e
ás3í
ás1ó
ás1t4a
ás3tú
ás3u
ás3ú
át3a
át1á
át2h1
á3t4h4e
át1ó
át3r
á5úl1
ba5ca1s4
bac1a
4bac1á
bac6s5
b5adar1
ba3dái
b3aidí
b3aig
b3aim
bain5t4
bais2c5e
bai6sc
baist3
bait3é
b6ait1í
b1aí
bal1bh5á
b4am1b6
banais3
ban1a
ban3d4
bar3b
bar1n2
b4ar2r1
bar3ú
ba5s6áir1
bas1á
ba5s6ár1
bas5c6ar6
basc1
basc3ar3n5
bat5a
bá5in2n1
bá5ite.
bá5iteá6
bá5it1í
bá5í6
b1ál1
b4ál1t
bár4
bár1t2h5
b1c
bc4á
b5da
b5dé
b3d2h
3beab
bea5bh6
bea6c
bea6l5t6
bear3bó
b1eá
b6eár1
5b4ei
beif6
beil6t
b4eil
beir5f
beir1
beir5t1í
beo3c
beoc2h4
beo5it1ea
beo5m
3béit
b1f
b3g2h
6bh.
b4ha
bha6d3á
bha3g4á
bh3aig
bhain3t4
bhaist3
bhal6b
bhalbh5
bhar3b
bhar3t4
bhat5a
bhá5in2n1
bhá5iteá6
bh4ár6
bhár1t2h5
bhc6á
bh1c
b4he
4bhe.
bh5eam
3bh4ea6r
2bh1eá
bheif6
bheil6t
bh4eil
bheir5f
bheir1
bheir5t1í
bheo3c
bheoc2h4
bheo5g
bhéal5
bhéa6l1t6
bh4é5an2n5
bhia5ta.
bhiat1a
bhia5t6ac6
3bh4id
bh3i4m
bhin6s3e
bhin1s2
bhin6sí
bhin6t5e
bhin1t
bhion5gó
bhio2ng
bh4ios5
3bh4irt
bhir1
6bh3iú
4bhíg
4bh3ím
bh3ín1
4bhío
bhí5ot
4bhít
bhí6t2h
3bh4las
bhla6
bhlá6
bhláf5
bhlead5
1bho
bhol6ta.
bh6ol1t
bhol6t5aí
bhol6tá
bh1ó
bhói5s6
bhó5l6ac
bhól1
bhran6d5
6bh3re.
bh6réa
bh6ric1
bhrí3oc
bhrí2o
bhrío5mh4
4bh1s2
bh5t1í
bht1
1bhu
bh4ua
bhua5da
bhua5im
bhua5ite.
bhual5
4bhuit
bh3uit2h1
bhurd5á
bhur2l3
bhust5
bhúir5
bh6úis5
bhúm5
bia3l
bia5ta.
biat1a
bia5t6ac6
bia5t6aig
bia5t6aí
b1id
bid5i
bin4
bi3n1é
bin5i
bin1s3
bin1t3
bion5gó
bio2ng
b4ios5
biosc6
6b1ir1
6bis3
bist4
b4it5s2
bí3c
b1ín1
b1ít
bít5eac
bít4e
bí6t2h5
bí6t1ig
bí3ti
blad5a
bla3gr
blas3
blá4
bláf3
blead5
bl6i
blim6
b1lí
b1ló
bn6i
b3ní
bod3ó
bol4s2
bol6ta.
b6ol1t
bol6t5aí
bol4tá
bord3
bos5t6
b1óg1
b3óid
bó5l6ac
ból1
bó6s5
bót2h5
bp6á
bp6i
bpist6
b5po
brad5á
bran6d5
bra2n3g4
brat5ó
bré6
b1rí
brío3mh4
b1s2
b1t
bt2h6
bua5da
bua3im
buair3
bua5ite.
bua5it2ear
buait1ea
buin6t4
bun1
bur2
burd3
bur1l1
bust5
3b4úid
búir5
búis5
búm3
ca3b5al
cab1a
c1ac
c1ad
ca3dá
cae4d3
caib5é
caidh5n3e
caid2h
caidhn2
cai5m4é
cain6d2
cain2t3
cair6b
cair1
cairbh5
cair6d5í
cair6t5e
c2ais1n2
cais3t6
cait3é
c1aí
cal5an
cal1a
calb4h3a
cal4m
ca3mán1
cam1á
can5c6
can5s6
can3t2
5c6aod
c6ar1a
3c4ar1b
carbh4
card3
c4ar1l
carn5á
c4ar1s2
c6art1a
cart6ac
car3ú
cas1
cast6
ca4s5tó
cat5a
cat3ó
c1á
5c6ác
cá4f3
cá6i
c2áid1
cáin6t5eac
cáin3te
cáin1t
cáin6ti
c6án2n1
cán1
cár5ta.
cár1
cár4t1a
c2át
c3bh6
c3d2h
2ce
cea6b
